Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2005.01
Relatives of decedent; computation of inheritance tax.

(1) For the purposes of sections 77-2004 and 77-2005, relatives of the decedent shall include:

(a) Relatives of a former spouse to whom the decedent was married at the time of the death of the former spouse and relatives of a spouse to whom the decedent was married at the time of his or her death; and

(b) Relatives of a spouse or former spouse of the decedent's parent, grandparent, child, sibling, uncle, aunt, niece, or nephew, if the decedent's parent, grandparent, child, sibling, uncle, aunt, niece, or nephew was married to the spouse at the date of death of the decedent or at the date of death of such spouse.

(2) The computation of any tax due pursuant to sections 77-2004, 77-2005, and 77-2006 shall be made without regard to Nebraska inheritance tax apportionment.

Laws 1976, LB 585, § 6;

Laws 1977, LB 456, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB310, § 3.

This section expands the operation of sections 77-2004 and 77-2005, extending the same tax treatment to the relatives of a former spouse to whom the deceased person was married at the time of the spouse's death, but in no sense conflicts with either of the other two statutes. In re Estate of Morse, 241 Neb. 40, 486 N.W.2d 195 (1992).